Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3171.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16B.98, subdivision 4, is amended to read: Subd. 4. Reporting of violations. new text begin (a) new text end A state employee who discovers evidence of violation of laws or rules governing grants deleted text begin is encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end report the violation or suspected violation to the employee's supervisor, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, or the legislative auditor.new text begin A failure to report the evidence, violation, or suspected violation is subject to disciplinary action, up to and including termination of employment. new text end new text begin (b)new text end The legislative auditor shall report to the Legislative Audit Commission if there are multiple complaints about the same agency. The auditor's report to the Legislative Audit Commission under this section must disclose only the number and type of violations alleged. An employee making a good faith report under this section has the protections provided for under section 181.932, prohibiting the employer from discriminating against the employee. Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 16C.045, is amended to read: 16C.045 REPORTING OF VIOLATIONS. new text begin (a) new text end A state employee who discovers evidence of violation of laws or rules governing state contracts deleted text begin is encouraged todeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end report the violation or suspected violation to the employee's supervisor, the commissioner or the commissioner's designee, or the legislative auditor. new text begin A failure to report the evidence, violation, or suspected violation is subject to disciplinary action, up to and including termination of employment. new text end new text begin (b) new text end The legislative auditor must report to the Legislative Audit Commission if there are multiple complaints about the same agency. The auditor's report to the Legislative Audit Commission under this section must disclose only the number and type of violations alleged. An employee making a good faith report under this section is covered by section 181.932, prohibiting the employer from discriminating against the employee.